South Dakota, session 2026, HB1055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 2-16-13 be AMENDED:
2-16-13. The official code of laws of the State of South Dakota, which may be
referred to as the code, consists of all the statutes of a general and permanent nature
contained in:
(1) The 2018 revision of volume 1;
(2) The 2021 revision of volume 2;
(3) The 2021 revision of volume 2A;
(4) The 2021 revision of volume 3;
(5) The 2004 revision of volume 4;
(6) The 2004 revision of volume 5;
(7) The 2020 revision of volume 6;
(8) The 2020 revision of volume 7;
(9) The 2018 revision of volume 8;
(10) The 2018 revision of volume 9;
(11) The 2014 revision of volume 10;
(12) The 2014 revision of volume 10A;
(13) The 2014 revision of volume 11;
(14) The 2016 revision of volume 12;
(15) The 2004 revision of volume 13;
(16) The 2017 revision of volume 14;
(17) The 2016 revision of volume 15;
(18) The 2024 revision of volume 16;
(19) The 2016 revision of volume 17;
(20) The 2024 revision of volume 18;

26.86.13 2 1055
(21) The 2011 revision of volume 19;
(22) The 2011 revision of volume 19A;
(23) The 2025 revision of volume 20;
(24) The 2025 revision of volume 20A;
(25) The 2013 revision of volume 21;
(26) The 2015 revision of volume 22;
(27) The 2015 revision of volume 22A;
(28) The 2022 revision of volume 23;
(29) The 2022 revision of volume 24;
(30) The 2004 revision of volume 25;
(31) The 2022 revision of volume 26;
(32) The 2007 revision of volume 27;
(33) The 2004 revision of volume 28;
(34) The 2017 revision of volume 29;
(35) The 2025 revision of volume 30;
(36) The 2025 revision of volume 31;
(37) The 2019 revision of volume 32;
(38) The 2019 revision of volume 33;
(39) The 2015 revision of volume 34;
(40) The 2004 revision of the Parallel Tables volume;
(41) The December 2025 Interim Update Service of the South Dakota Codified Laws
beginning with Title 1, chapter 1-1 and ending with Title 62, chapter 62-9; and
(42) The 2025 cumulative annual pocket parts.
Section 2. That § 2-16-15 be AMENDED:
2-16-15. No provision of the code enacted by § 2-16-13, as to which any action
or proceeding, civil or criminal, has been commenced prior to July 1, 2026, to determine
whether or not the provision was constitutionally enacted, is validated by the enactment
of the code.
The enactment of the code:
(1) Does not affect the validity of any transaction;
(2) Does not impair the curative or legalizing effect of any statute; and
(3) Does not release or extinguish any penalty, confiscation, forfeiture, or liability;
which accrued, occurred, or took effect prior to the time the code took effect.
HB1055 ENROLLED

26.86.13 3 1055
Section 3. That § 2-16-16 be AMENDED:
2-16-16. All statutes enacted at the 2026 session of the Legislature, other than
the code enacted by § 2-16-13, are deemed to have been enacted subsequent to the
enactment of the code. If any statute repeals, amends, contravenes, or is inconsistent
with the provisions of the code, the provisions of the statute prevail. Any enactment in
the 2026 session of the Legislature that cites South Dakota Codified Laws for the purpose
of amendment or repeal must be construed as having reference to the code enacted by
§ 2-16-13.
HB1055 ENROLLED

26.86.13 4 1055
An Act to update the official code of laws.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1055
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1055 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1055 ENROLLED